District of Columbia statutes.
49-903

Musicians.

(a)

During the annual encampment, and on every duty on parade ordered by the Commanding General, there shall be allowed and paid for each day of service:

(1)

To each member of the regularly enlisted bands, $4;

(2)

To the chief musicians, $8; and

(3)

To the principal musicians, $6.

(b)

In the event there is no enlisted band or field music, or not a sufficient number of either, the Commanding General may authorize the employment of such as he may deem necessary for the occasion; provided, that the total pay of the enlisted musicians shall not in any event exceed the rates authorized by this section.

History

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 780, ch. 328, § 56
Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 635, ch. 146, § 64

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 39-703.
1973 Ed., § 39-803.